Utah statutes.
71-11-9.   Disposition of deceased resident's property.
(1) (a)  All money or other personal property of a resident held by a home
that is left on the premises of the home shall, upon the death of the
resident, be held in trust to be paid or delivered to the spouse, children,
grandchildren, or parent of the resident upon the presentation of proof of
relationship.
(b)  Any funds of a deceased resident may be disbursed for the payment of
funeral expenses or any obligation owed to the home.
(2)  Property owned by a deceased resident of the home who dies without heirs
or next-of-kin not disposed of by will shall become the property of the home
and deposited in the fund, subject to the right of any heir to reclaim the
property within five years after the resident's death upon the presentation of
proof of relationship.
